Kentucky statutes. TITLE I Sovereignty and Jurisdiction of the Commonwealth
CHAPTER 3 Grants to United States of Lands and Rights to Acquire

3.010.
Consent of state to acquisition of lands.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky consents to the acquisition by the United States of all lands and appurtenances in this state, by condemnation, gift or purchase, which are needful to their constitutional purposes, but said acquisition shall not be deemed to result in a cession of jurisdiction by this Commonwealth.

History.

2376, 2376a-1, 2376c-1: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 173, § 1; 1954, ch. 217, § 1, effective June 17, 1954.

3.020.
Jurisdiction retained for execution of process.

Kentucky retains jurisdiction for the execution of process, issued under its authority, over all lands in Kentucky heretofore or hereafter ceded to or acquired by the United States for the erection or establishment of post offices, custom houses, courthouses, locks, dams, canals, parks, cemeteries, or forest reserves.

History.

2376a-1, 2376b-1, 2376c-1, 2376e-2, 2739f-2, 2739f-8, 3766e-17, 3766e-30.

3.025.
Jurisdiction over federal correctional institution at Ashland ceded.

Kentucky cedes to the United States jurisdiction over the area embraced by the federal correctional institution at Ashland.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 190, § 1, effective June 16, 1960.

3.026.
Jurisdiction over federal correctional institution at Fayette County ceded.

Kentucky cedes to the United States jurisdiction over the area embraced by the federal correctional institution at Fayette County.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 134, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

3.027.
Jurisdiction over federal correctional institution at Manchester ceded.

Kentucky cedes to the United States concurrent civil and criminal jurisdiction over all of the land and premises acquired by the United States in Clay County constituting the federal correctional institution at Manchester.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 8, § 1, effective April 29, 1994.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/94). By a letter dated April 29, 1994, the Attorney General of the United States advised the Governor of Kentucky that the United States accepted jurisdiction over the correctional facility as provided by 1994 Ky. Acts ch. 8, sec. 2, thereby making effective this statute.

3.028.
Jurisdiction over federal correctional facilities in McCreary and Martin Counties ceded.

Kentucky cedes to the United States concurrent civil and criminal jurisdiction over all of the lands acquired by the United States in McCreary County and Martin County acquired for a United States penitentiary and ancillary correctional facilities, including lands now owned and adjacent lands that may be acquired by the United States in the future as part of said correctional facilities.

The cession granted hereby shall remain in effect as to all of said land, or any portion thereof that continues to be owned by the United States and used as a United States penitentiary and ancillary correctional facilities.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 13, § 1, effective March 1, 2002.

3.030.
Jurisdiction over military post (Fort Knox) at West Point ceded.

Kentucky cedes to the United States all the rights and jurisdiction which she now possesses over the land and premises in the vicinity of West Point, Kentucky, conveyed or to be conveyed to the United States for the purpose of establishing a permanent camp of instruction and military post, so long as the same shall remain the property of the United States.

History.

2376d-1.

3.040.
Jurisdiction of military park at Perryville ceded.

Kentucky cedes its jurisdiction to the United States over so much of any lands, not exceeding three thousand (3,000) acres, as may be selected in Boyle County, near Perryville, for the purpose of establishing, maintaining, beautifying and protecting a national military park at the battlefield of Perryville.

History.

2376b-1.

3.050.
Perryville battlefield to be conveyed to the United States.

Whenever the United States Congress enacts a law authorizing the United States to take over the Perryville battlefield, now in the hands of the Division of Parks, the Governor shall appoint a commissioner who shall make and execute on behalf of Kentucky, a deed conveying fee simple title to the United States for national cemetery or park purposes, in conformity with the provisions of the Act of Congress when enacted, seventeen and three-fourths (17.75) acres of land, more or less, in Boyle County, Kentucky, now owned and held by the Commonwealth of Kentucky, together with all improvements thereon and appurtenances thereunto belonging. The conveyance shall be made free of any cost or charge to the United States for the property conveyed. The commissioner may ascertain by survey or otherwise the metes and bounds of the land conveyed and include in the deed an appropriate description of the land. The deed shall contain a clause to the effect that, when the United States shall cease to use or maintain the land conveyed as a national cemetery or park, upon demand of the Governor of Kentucky, it shall revert to Kentucky, and complete jurisdiction over it shall be again vested in Kentucky. The deed shall be in a form agreeable to the provisions of the Act of Congress, when enacted.

When the conveyance to the United States is made, the jurisdiction of Kentucky shall thereby be ceded to and vested in the United States over the land conveyed. The jurisdiction hereby ceded shall continue no longer than the United States of America shall own the land.

History.

2739f-8.

3.060.
Zachary Taylor burial grounds ceded.

Kentucky cedes its jurisdiction to the United States over all that portion of the Zachary Taylor burial grounds and appurtenances in Jefferson County which were conveyed by Kentucky to the United States for national cemetery purposes, so long as the United States shall own the land.

If and when the remaining portions of said burial grounds, or any of them, or any approaches thereto, shall be conveyed to the United States, the jurisdiction of Kentucky over same shall be thereby ceded to, and shall vest in the United States, so long as same shall be used for national cemetery purposes.

History.

2739f-2.

3.070.
Jurisdiction of land for Mammoth Cave National Park ceded.

The United States is authorized to acquire, pursuant to the provisions of this section, as well as in pursuance to KRS

148.111

,

148.121

,

148.141

and

148.151

, the lands, including the caves and caverns underlying the same, within the area hereinafter referred to, as well as any lands contiguous or adjacent thereto which may hereafter be duly authorized for acquisition for national park purposes, for the purpose of converting same into, and for the establishment and maintenance thereon of, a national park as contemplated and provided for by the Act of Congress entitled “An Act to provide for the establishment of the Mammoth Cave National Park in the State of Kentucky, and for other purposes,” approved May 25, 1926 (44 Stat. 635), and any amendments thereto. The lands, consisting of approximately 70,618 acres, are situated in the counties of Edmonson, Barren and Hart, in Kentucky. The general boundaries thereof are set forth in the report of the Southern Appalachian National Park Commission to the Secretary of the Interior, under the date of April 8, 1926.

The jurisdiction of Kentucky is ceded to the United States over, within and under all the territory so acquired by the United States. Kentucky reserves the right to tax sales of gasoline and other motor conveyance fuels and oils for use in motor conveyances, except to the extent that such gasoline and other fuels and oils are used by the United States and its agents in the administration, protection, improvement, maintenance, development and operation of the land, and the right to tax persons, their franchises and properties, on the land so acquired. Persons residing on the land shall have the right to vote at all elections within the respective counties of their residence the same as if the land had not been acquired by the United States. Jurisdiction shall not vest in the United States until the United States, through the Secretary of the Interior, notifies the Governor of Kentucky that the United States assumes police jurisdiction over the land so acquired.

History.

3766e-16 to 3766e-18: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 255, § 1.

3.080.
Consent to acquisition of national forest reserves — Jurisdiction.

Kentucky consents to the acquisition by the United States, by purchase or gift, or by condemnation, of such lands within the boundaries of Kentucky as in the opinion of the United States are needed for the establishment of national forest reserves within prescribed areas. Before such establishment the written approval and consent of the Governor of Kentucky, recorded in his office, shall be given as to the area of lands acquired by the United States.

When forest reserves are established by the United States, either under existing federal statutes or any hereinafter enacted, then consent of Kentucky is given for Congress to pass such laws and to make or provide for the making of such rules and regulations, of both civil and criminal nature, and provide punishment therefor, as in its judgment may be necessary for the management, control and protection of the land as may be acquired by the United States under the provisions of this section.

History.

3766e-30, 3766e-31: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 173, § 2.

3.090.
General Assembly to be furnished request for cession of jurisdiction of land to United States.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

3.255

to

3.275

, whenever the United States, or any agency thereof, shall request the Commonwealth to cede jurisdiction over any area, it shall be the duty of the Governor to transmit such request to the next session of the General Assembly for such action as it may deem proper.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 217, § 2, effective June 17, 1954; 1978, ch. 68, § 7, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Commonwealth of Kentucky has jurisdiction over the Camp Breckinridge grounds for certain purposes.

OAG 60-561

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

National park system lands, concurrent legislative jurisdiction for criminal law enforcement, KRS

3.250

to

3.275

.

3.100.
Letter accepting jurisdiction by United States to be entered upon executive journal.

Whenever the United States accepts the cession of jurisdiction over any area, the letter of acceptance shall be entered upon the executive journal.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 217, § 3, effective June 17, 1954.

3.110.
Consent to retrocession of jurisdiction by United States.

Except as otherwise provided in KRS

3.255

to

3.275

, the Commonwealth consents to any retrocession by the United States of lands within its geographical boundaries whenever the United States shall have ceased to exercise exclusive or special jurisdiction over such lands. Inter alia, the conveyance of lands to private owners shall be deemed to constitute a retrocession of jurisdiction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 217, § 4, effective June 17, 1954; 1978, ch. 68, § 8, effective June 17, 1978.